Arkansas, session 2025, HB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Caring for Caregivers
Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-518. Caring for caregivers credit.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Activities of daily living" means:
(A) Ambulating, which is the extent of an individual's
ability to move from one (1) position to another and walk independently;
(B) Feeding, which is the ability of an individual to feed
himself or herself;
(C) Dressing, which is the ability of an individual to
*JLL084*
01/06/2025 9:58:12 AM JLL084

HB1076
select appropriate clothes and put the clothes on without aid;
(D) Personal hygiene, which is the ability of an
individual to bathe and groom himself or herself and maintain dental hygiene
and nail and hair care;
(E) Continence, which is the ability of an individual to
control bladder and bowel function; and
(F) Toileting, which is the ability of an individual to
get to and from the toilet without aid, use the toilet appropriately, and
clean himself or herself;
(2)(A) "Eligible expenditure" means an expense directly related
to assisting a family caregiver in providing care to an eligible family
member.
(B) "Eligible expenditure" includes without limitation:
(i) An improvement or alteration to the primary
residence of a family caregiver or an eligible family member to permit the
eligible family member to live in the residence and to remain mobile, safe,
and independent;
(ii) The purchase or lease by a family caregiver of
equipment, including without limitation durable medical equipment, that is
necessary to assist an eligible family member in carrying out one (1) or more
activities of daily living; and
(iii) Other expenses paid or incurred by a family
caregiver that assist the family caregiver in providing care to an eligible
family member, including without limitation expenses related to:
(a) Home care aides;
(b) Respite care;
(c) Adult day care;
(d) Personal care attendants;
(e) Healthcare equipment; and
(f) Technology.
(C) "Eligible expenditure" does not include expenses
incurred in carrying out general household maintenance activities, including
without limitation painting, plumbing services, electrical repairs, and
exterior maintenance;
(3) "Eligible family member" means an individual who:
(A) Is at least sixty-two (62) years of age;
01/06/2025 9:58:12 AM JLL084

HB1076
(B) Requires assistance with at least two (2) activities
of daily living, as certified by a licensed healthcare practitioner licensed
under § 17-95-401 et seq.;
(C) Qualifies as a dependent, spouse, parent, or other
relation by blood or marriage to the family caregiver; and
(D) Lives in a private residential home and not in an
assisted living center, nursing facility, or residential care home;
(4) "Family caregiver" means an individual who:
(A) Provides care and support for an eligible family
member;
(B) Has a total adjusted gross income of less than fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000), including the adjusted gross income of his or her
spouse, if any; and
(C) Has personally incurred uncompensated expenses
directly related to the care of an eligible family member; and
(5) "Veteran" means a person who served in the active military,
naval, air, or space service and who was discharged or released from service
under conditions other than dishonorable.
(b)(1) Subject to the limitations provided in this section, there is
allowed an income tax credit against the income tax imposed by this chapter
in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the eligible expenditures
incurred by a family caregiver for the care and support of an eligible family
member.
(2) The maximum tax credit that may be claimed by a taxpayer in
a tax year under this section is:
(A) Two thousand dollars ($2,000); or
(B) Three thousand dollars ($3,000), if the eligible
family member for whom the family caregiver has incurred eligible
expenditures is a veteran or has a diagnosis of dementia.
(3) If two (2) or more taxpayers claim the income tax credit
allowed under this section for the same eligible family member, the total
amount of the income tax credit allowed under this section shall be allocated
in equal amounts among the taxpayers.
(4)(A) The total amount of the income tax credits allowed under
this section shall not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) in a calendar year.
01/06/2025 9:58:12 AM JLL084

HB1076
(B) The income tax credit allowed under this section shall
be awarded in the order in which the income tax credit is claimed, up to the
maximum amount stated in subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section.
(c) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that may be
claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of income
tax due by the taxpayer.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 2 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.



























01/06/2025 9:58:12 AM JLL084